New Jersey, session 222, S3676.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. Section 24 of P.L.2003, c.280 (C.45:14-63) is amended to read as follows: 24. a. No pharmacist shall administer a prescription medication directly to a patient without appropriate education or certification, as determined by the board in accordance with the requirements set forth in the rules jointly promulgated by the board and the State Board of Medical Examiners.  Such medication shall only be for the treatment of a disease for which a nationally certified program is in effect, or as determined by the board, and only if utilized for the treatment of that disease for which the medication is prescribed or indicated or for which the collaborative drug therapy management permits. b. (1) Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy extern may administer drugs to a patient 18 years of age or older, provided the pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy extern is appropriately educated and qualified, as determined by the board in accordance with the requirements set forth in the rules jointly promulgated by the board and the State Board of Medical Examiners, and provided the drugs are administered under any one of the following conditions: (a)   pursuant to a prescription by an authorized prescriber for a vaccine and related emergency medications; (b)   in immunization programs implemented pursuant to an authorized prescriber's standing order for the vaccine and related emergency medications; or (c)   in immunization programs and programs sponsored by governmental agencies that are not patient specific. (2)   A pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy extern may administer an influenza vaccine to a patient who is seven years of age or older.  For a patient who is under 18 years of age, a pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy extern shall not administer a vaccine except with the permission of the patient's parent or legal guardian.  For a patient who is under 10 years of age, a pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy extern shall not administer a vaccine unless pursuant to a prescription by an authorized prescriber.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require a patient 10 years of age or older to obtain a prescription for an influenza vaccine. (3)   A pharmacy intern or pharmacy extern, as defined by regulation of the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy, may administer immunizations to patients by injection or by other delivery method, provided that the pharmacy intern or pharmacy extern is acting under the direct supervision of a licensed pharmacist who is pre-approved by the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy to administer vaccines and related emergency medications, and who is in compliance with the rules jointly promulgated by the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy and the State Board of Medical Examiners. c.     An immunization administered to a patient by a pharmacist, pharmacy intern, or pharmacy extern shall be reported by a supervising pharmacist to the New Jersey Immunization Information System established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2004, c.138 (C.26:4-134) as required pursuant to N.J.A.C.8:57-3.16, for inclusion in the patient's registry. d. (1) Notwithstanding any law, order, rule, or regulation to the contrary, and pursuant to a prescription issued by an authorized prescriber for a long-acting injectable drug, a pharmacist may administer the long-acting injectable drug to the patient, provided that the pharmacist is appropriately educated and qualified to administer the drug, as determined by the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy, and in accordance with requirements set forth in rules jointly promulgated by the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy and the State Board of Medical Examiners. (2) As used in subsection, long-acting injectable drug means a medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that is injected into a patient to treat or manage symptoms of a psychiatric condition or disorder, for up to 24 weeks with a single dose. (cf: P.L.2018, c.143, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.